Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202050-114.03
Clerk; reports; list; distribution; establish requirements for reports.

(1) The Clerk of the Legislature shall periodically prepare and distribute electronically to all members
of the Legislature a list of all reports received from state agencies, boards,
and commissions. Such lists shall be prepared and distributed to each legislator
no less frequently than once during the first ten days of each legislative
session. Upon request by a legislator, the clerk shall arrange for any legislator
to receive an electronic copy of any
such report.

(2) A state agency, board, or commission or other public entity which
is required to provide a report to the Legislature shall
submit the report electronically. The Clerk of the Legislature
may establish requirements for the electronic submission, distribution, and
format of such reports. The clerk may accept a report in written form only
upon a showing of good cause.

Laws 1979, LB 322, § 79;

Laws 2003, LB 114, § 1;

Laws 2012, LB719, § 2;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 74.